Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202481-12,196
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Nebraska Rural Projects Act, the definitions found in sections 81-12,197 to 81-12,207 shall be used.

Laws 2021, LB40, § 2;

Laws 2024, LB164, § 20.
April 17, 2024